Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 3

Senior Judge Enabling Act

17-2-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Senior Judge Enabling Act of 1990.”

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 12 provided that, notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, annual expenditures made to carry out the purposes of this part shall be subject to and shall not exceed the specific funding amount provided in each year's general appropriations act for the funding of the provisions of this part. Further, the funding for fiscal year 1990-1991 shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

17-2-302. Requests for senior designation.

Any former supreme court justice, judge of an intermediate appellate court or judge of a state court of record who has at least eight (8) years of creditable service as a state justice or judge may request to be designated as a senior justice or judge.

Requests for senior designation shall be filed with the administrative director of the courts and shall be accompanied by:

Evidence that the justice or judge does not suffer from a permanent physical or mental disability that would substantially interfere with the performance of the justice's or judge's duties;

A written agreement that the justice or judge will not engage in the practice of law while serving as a senior justice or judge;

A written agreement that the justice or judge will be available to perform judicial duties for at least an aggregate period of thirty (30) weeks out of each successive twelve-month period;

A written agreement that the justice or judge will continue to file the disclosure statements required by title 8, chapter 50, part 5 during the justice's or judge's tenure as a senior justice or judge;

A written agreement that the justice or judge will abide by the code of judicial conduct; and

A duly executed oath of office, taken in the manner prescribed in § 17-1-104, stating:

“I, , do solemnly swear that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Tennessee, and that I will administer justice without respect of persons and impartially discharge to the best of my ability all the duties of the office of senior justice (or judge) of the state of Tennessee on which I am about to enter.”

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 2; 1993, ch. 66, § 32; 1999, ch. 86, § 1; 2002, ch. 639, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2002, ch. 639, § 9 provided that, during fiscal year 2001-2002, that act shall be implemented exclusively from funds provided for the senior judge program by the provisions of Acts 2001, chs. 435 and 464. In subsequent fiscal years, the act shall not be construed or implemented in any manner that requires increased funding for the senior judge program beyond the rate of inflation.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 86, § 2 provided that it was the clear and unequivocal intent of the general assembly that subsection (a) as amended by that act have retroactive application to November 30, 1997.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed legislation that gives the Tennessee Supreme Court the authority to appoint any former judge or justice who has at least one year of judicial service to serve as “a senior judge to hear complex commercial disputes” raises significant constitutional concerns. Unlike existing law, the proposed legislation would permit a former judge who has minimal judicial experience and who has never won a judicial election to serve in a judicial capacity. Such appointment would not be temporary but would be for a four-year term, renewable without limitation at the discretion of the Supreme Court. OAG 18-14, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (3/23/2018).

The proposed legislation that would allow the Supreme Court to transfer complex commercial cases from the assigned trial court judge to a senior business judge does itself not raise constitutional concerns. It constitutes a specific grant of authority to transfer cases in furtherance of the Supreme Court’s existing supervisory authority. OAG 18-14, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (3/23/2018).

17-2-303. Issuance of commission — Term.

The supreme court is authorized to appoint senior judges only after it has made an affirmative finding that the effective administration of justice in one (1) or more judicial districts requires additional judicial resources.

If the supreme court, at its discretion, determines that a former justice or judge is physically and mentally capable of performing valuable judicial service on a continuing basis and that the justice's or judge's service will promote the effective administration of justice, then the supreme court shall cause an appropriate commission to be issued under its seal for the period provided in subsection (c); provided, that such commission shall be issued only to a former justice or judge who left the justice's or judge's most recent term of judicial service in good standing with the board of judicial conduct or any successor to the board.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3), no such commission shall be issued to any former justice or judge who, during the justice's or judge's most recent term of judicial service, sought reelection or retention but was defeated in the reelection or retention bid.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(2), if the election following the most recent term of judicial service for a judge in a state court of record results in the judge not being reelected, the judge is authorized to be issued a commission if the judge has been elected at least twice and served at least two (2) full eight-year terms.

The supreme court's designation shall be for a term of four (4) years unless the justice or judge has reached seventy (70) years of age, whereupon the term of the designation shall be for two (2) years or for any shorter period deemed proper by the supreme court. Senior justices and judges shall be eligible for reappointment.

The supreme court's decision with regard to the initial designation or the renewal of senior designation is final and cannot be reviewed in any manner.

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 3; 2002, ch. 639, § 3; 2016, ch. 1023, § 1; 2018, ch. 829, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2002, ch. 639, § 9 provided that, during fiscal year 2001-2002, that act shall be implemented exclusively from funds provided for the senior judge program by the provisions of Acts 2001, chs. 435 and 464. In subsequent fiscal years, the act shall not be construed or implemented in any manner that requires increased funding for the senior judge program beyond the rate of inflation.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote subsection (b) which read: “If the supreme court, in its discretion, determines that a former justice or judge is physically and mentally capable of performing valuable judicial service on a continuing basis and that the justice's or judge's service will promote the effective administration of justice, then the supreme court shall cause an appropriate commission to be issued under its seal for the period provided in subsection (c); however, no such commission shall be issued to any former justice or judge who, during the justice's or judge's most recent term of judicial service, sought reelection or retention but was defeated in the reelection or retention bid.”

The 2018 amendment added the proviso at the end of (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1023, § 2. April 28, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 829, § 2. April 27, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed legislation that gives the Tennessee Supreme Court the authority to appoint any former judge or justice who has at least one year of judicial service to serve as “a senior judge to hear complex commercial disputes” raises significant constitutional concerns. Unlike existing law, the proposed legislation would permit a former judge who has minimal judicial experience and who has never won a judicial election to serve in a judicial capacity. Such appointment would not be temporary but would be for a four-year term, renewable without limitation at the discretion of the Supreme Court. OAG 18-14, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (3/23/2018).

The proposed legislation that would allow the Supreme Court to transfer complex commercial cases from the assigned trial court judge to a senior business judge does itself not raise constitutional concerns. It constitutes a specific grant of authority to transfer cases in furtherance of the Supreme Court’s existing supervisory authority. OAG 18-14, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (3/23/2018).

17-2-304. Assignment — Powers, duties and immunities.

The chief justice may, with the senior justice's or judge's consent, assign the senior justice or judge to any state court.

The assignment of a senior justice or judge shall be made by an order that designates the court to which the judge is assigned and the duration of the assignment. Promptly after the assignment of a senior justice or judge, the clerk of the supreme court in the grand division to which the assignment is made shall cause a certified copy of the order to be sent to the senior justice or judge and another certified copy to the presiding judge of the court to which the justice or judge is assigned.

A senior justice or judge assigned as provided in this section has all the powers, duties and immunities while serving under the assignment of a regularly elected and qualified justice or judge of the court to which the senior justice or judge has been assigned. Without assignment, senior justices and judges may perform routine ministerial acts, including the solemnization of marriages and the administering of oaths, but shall not admit to bail any person accused of a crime.

A senior justice or judge who has sat by designation and assignment on any court may, notwithstanding the expiration of the designation and assignment, decide or join in the decision and final disposition of all matters submitted to the justice or judge during the period of the assignment and may decide or join in the consideration and disposition of petitions for rehearing or further proceedings in the matters, including matters relating to cases on appeal.

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 4.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11, § VII.

17-2-305. Compensation, benefits, quarters, personnel and expenses.

Senior justices and judges shall receive a salary calculated on the amount of time the senior justice or judge actually worked. The rate of payment shall be based upon the current compensation of the former office held by the senior justice or judge; provided, that where a senior justice or judge is receiving a retirement allowance under any retirement program administered by the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, the total combined annual amount of retirement allowance and annual salary received as a senior justice or judge cannot exceed the current annual compensation of the office from which the justice or judge retired.

The salary shall be payable in monthly installments by the commissioner of finance and administration out of the state treasury.

Senior justices and judges shall be considered to be state employees and shall be entitled to participate in the state's insurance and benefit programs on the same basis as other active justices and judges, except as provided in subdivision (b)(2).

Any senior justice or judge who has not attained the maximum creditable service under the retirement system to which the justice or judge belongs shall be entitled to receive credit in the retirement system for service as a senior justice or judge; provided, that the senior justice or judge:

Elects to receive the credit by notice to the board of trustees of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system; and

Authorizes the deduction of the applicable contributions as set forth under title 8, chapter 37, part 2.

Such service shall be based on the actual work performed and shall be added to the creditable service of the senior justice or judge. On July 1 of each year, the senior justice's or judge's retirement benefits shall be adjusted according to the retirement system to which the senior justice or judge belongs, as appropriate.

Notwithstanding this subsection (b) to the contrary, any former judge who is a retired member of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system or of a superseded system as defined in § 8-34-101 and who is designated or redesignated as a senior justice or judge on or after July 1, 2018, shall reenroll as an active member of the retirement system, make such contributions as are required for the judge's position, and establish credit for the additional service.

Senior justices and judges shall be provided with suitable office space and equipment, secretarial and research assistance and a law library similar to that provided to active justices and judges. Local governments presently responsible for providing quarters, personnel or other support for state judges shall cooperate with and assist the administrative director of the courts in providing for the reasonable needs of the senior justices or judges assigned to work in their county.

A senior justice or judge assigned to a court located outside of the justice's or judge's county of residence shall receive the same reimbursement for travel expenses that is provided to active justices and judges. The expenses shall be paid upon the presentation of an itemized statement certified by the senior justice or judge to be correct.

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 5; 1993, ch. 66, § 33; 1995, ch. 491, § 1; 2002, ch. 639, §§ 4-7; 2018, ch. 736, § 27.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2002, ch. 639, § 9 provided that, during fiscal year 2001-2002, that act shall be implemented exclusively from funds provided for the senior judge program by the provisions Acts 2001, chs. 435 and 464. In subsequent fiscal years, the act shall not be construed or implemented in any manner that requires increased funding for the senior judge program beyond the rate of inflation.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (d), redesignated former (b)(2) as present (b)(2)(A), redesignated former (b)(2)(A) and (b)(2)(B) as present (b)(2)(A)(i) and (b)(2)(A)(ii), respectively, redesignated former (b)(3) as present (b)(2)(B), and added (b)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 736, § 29. April 18, 2018.

17-2-306. Termination of senior status.

Certification as a senior justice or judge shall terminate upon the expiration of the commission issued by the supreme court, except that the certification shall terminate earlier when any of the following occurs:

The senior justice or judge requests termination of the status;

The board of judicial conduct so orders;

The senior justice or judge declines more than three (3) assignments pursuant to § 17-2-304(a) without good cause within any calendar year; or

The supreme court, after affording the senior justice or judge notice and an opportunity to respond, determines that the senior justice or judge has failed to meet or to abide by any of the requirements of § 17-2-302(b). Senior justices or judges aggrieved by the supreme court's decision shall have the right to request that the decision be reviewed by the board of judicial conduct. After reviewing the supreme court's decision, the board of judicial conduct shall state its findings and may make recommendations to the supreme court.

Termination of senior status for any reason shall not affect the amount of any retirement or other benefit to which the senior justice or judge would be otherwise entitled.

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 6; 2012, ch. 819, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 5 provided that, in order to carry out its functions, duties, and responsibilities maintained under the provisions of the act, which amended subdivisions (a)(2) and (4), the court of the judiciary shall retain and have the authority to exercise any and all of its powers and duties existing under title 17 prior to enactment of the act, including, but not limited to, the power to subpoena, the power to take evidence, and the power to examine. Upon the termination of the court of the judiciary, the board of judicial conduct is expressly granted the same powers and duties as set forth above for the court of the judiciary in order to carry out its responsibilities established this chapter. The board of judicial conduct also is expressly authorized to continue any preliminary investigations, full investigations, and/or trials scheduled or in progress by the court of the judiciary at the time of termination of the court of the judiciary. This authorization includes the right to use any evidence obtained or taken by the court of the judiciary without the need to obtain again or retake any such evidence, including, but not limited to, prior issued subpoenas.

Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 6 provided that: (a) All rules of the court of the judiciary in effect on July 1, 2012, shall remain in full force and effect as rules of the board of judicial conduct until modified or repealed by the board of judicial conduct.

The initial rules adopted by the board of judicial conduct shall serve as the temporary rules of the board. The temporary rules shall remain in effect until such time as approved or not approved by the general assembly, with the board's chairperson presenting the rules, during the first session of the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly using the same procedure set out in §16-3-404 for rules of court. If approved, the rules shall become the permanent rules of the board. All subsequent modifications or additions to such rules shall be approved by the general assembly in accordance with the procedures set forth in §16-3-404.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, in (a), substituted “board of judicial conduct” for “court of the judiciary” in (2) and in the second and third sentences of (4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 8. July 1, 2012; provided, that, for the purposes of appointing the members of the board of judicial conduct created by the act, the act shall take effect April 25, 2012.

17-2-307. Conclusion of law practice.

A former justice or judge who is engaged in the practice of law at the time of designation as a senior justice or judge shall conclude all legal practice as soon as practicable on a timetable approved by the chief justice. The chief justice may, if warranted, withhold the issuance of the senior justice's or judge's commission pending resolution of all or any part of the former justice's or judge's practice.

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 7; 1993, ch. 66, § 34; 2002, ch. 639, § 8.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2002, ch. 639, § 9 provided that, during fiscal year 2001-2002, that act shall be implemented exclusively from funds provided for the senior judge program by the provisions Acts 2001, chs. 435 and 464. In subsequent fiscal years, the act shall not be construed or implemented in any manner that requires increased funding for the senior judge program beyond the rate of inflation.

17-2-308. Provisions of part supplemental.

This part is intended to be in addition to and supplemental to this chapter and §§ 8-36-806 and 16-3-502(2) and shall not be construed to supersede these provisions as they exist on January 1, 1991.

In the case of conflict between this part and any other statute, this part will control and shall not be used to supplant or replace an existing judge or an additional judge who is to be elected pursuant to § 16-2-505.

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 8.

17-2-309. Consultations regarding appointments.

The supreme court shall advise and consult with the chairs of the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the senate and with the commissioner of finance and administration whenever it has reason to believe that the effective administration of justice requires the appointment of one (1) or more senior justices or judges.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment].

[Deleted by 2016 amendment].

Acts 1990, ch. 1025, § 10; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 35, 36; 2013, ch. 236, § 46; 2016, ch. 797, § 13; 2019, ch. 345, § 28.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the civil justice and finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the senate” for “the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives” in (a), (b), and the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of (c).

The 2016 amendment deleted former (b) and (c) which read: “(b) If, following these consultations, the supreme court appoints a senior justice or judge, the administrative director of the courts shall file a report with the commissioner of finance and administration and with the civil justice and finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the senate stating the number of justices or judges to be appointed, the reasons for the appointment and the circuits or courts expected to be served.“(c) By no later than February 1 of each year, the administrative director of the courts shall file a report concerning the utilization of the senior justices and judges with the civil justice and finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the senate and with the commissioner of finance and administration. The report shall identify the:“(1) Persons serving as senior justices or judges during the prior calendar year and the date and length of their appointments;“(2) Court or courts on which each justice or judge worked during the prior calendar year;“(3) Number of weeks each justice or judge worked during the prior calendar year; and“(4) Total expenses for the program during the prior calendar year showing the:“(A) Total personnel expenses for the senior justices and judges;“(B) Total expenses for support personnel;“(C) Total expenditures for office space, furniture, books and equipment; and“(D) Total expenditures for travel and related items.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “judiciary” for “civil justice” following “chairs of the” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

Acts 2016, ch. 797, § 19. April 14, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.